Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-123
Intent, purpose, public policy; freedom of speech.

It is the intent, purpose, and public policy to protect, preserve, and perpetuate the constitutional right to freely speak, write, and publish on all lawful subjects, including the right to make a comprehensive distribution of such printed materials, either commercial or noncommercial, by using the most effective lawful means or methods, and being responsible for any damages.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 19, p. 550.